Hawaii statutes.
[§244D-2] Permit. (a) It shall be
unlawful for any dealer to sell liquor unless a permit has been issued to the
dealer as hereinafter prescribed, and such permit is in full force and effect.

(b) The liquor commission shall certify to the
department of taxation from time to time and within forty-eight hours after
such license is issued the name of every dealer, together with the dealer's
place of business and the period covered by the dealer's license. The
department thereupon shall issue its permit to such person for the period
covered by the person's license upon the payment of a permit fee of $2.50. The
permit shall be issued by the department as of the date when the liquor
commission issued the license.

(c) Any permit issued under this chapter shall
not be assignable; it shall be conspicuously displayed on the licensed premises
of the permittee; it shall expire on June 30 next succeeding the date upon
which it is issued, unless sooner suspended, surrendered, or revoked for cause
by the department; and it shall be renewed annually before July 1, upon
fulfillment of all requirements as in the case of an original permit and the
payment of a renewal fee of $2.50. Whenever a permit is defaced, destroyed, or
lost, or the licensed premises are relocated, the department may issue a
duplicate permit to the permittee upon the payment of a fee of 50 cents.

(d) The department may suspend, or, after
hearing, revoke, any permit issued under this chapter whenever it finds that
the permittee has failed to comply with this chapter, or any rule or regulation
of the department prescribed, adopted, and promulgated under this chapter.
Upon suspending or revoking any permit the department shall request the
permittee to surrender to it immediately the permit, or any duplicate thereof
issued to the permittee, and the permittee shall surrender the same promptly to
the department as requested. Whenever the department suspends a permit, it
shall notify the permittee immediately and afford the permittee a hearing, if desired,
and if a hearing has not already been afforded. After the hearing the
department shall either rescind its order of suspension, or good cause
appearing therefor, shall continue the suspension or revoke the permit. [L Sp
1984 1st, c 1, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next